Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 5

Information on Child Abuse Prevention

37-10-501. Promotion of parental help line for prevention of child abuse.

In an effort to inform the citizens of Tennessee of a free resource for families and reduce instances of child abuse, the following measures shall be performed. All public transportation buses within the state of Tennessee are urged to promote the existence of a parental help line organized by the nonprofit organization Prevent Child Abuse Tennessee and the telephone numbers for such organization, 1-800-356-6767 and 1-800-CHILDREN, as space allows in interior advertising. The department of education shall require all local education agencies to distribute information on the help line, including the telephone number, to students and the students' parents. The department of human services shall also require any licensed child care facility to distribute information on the help line, including the telephone number, to children who attend the facility and the children's parents. This section shall assist children, parents, teachers and child care workers in providing the information and support necessary for the positive development of children through a currently existing, and free to the public, resource.

Acts 2010, ch. 1105, § 1.